Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.470

Disposition of moneys collected under chapter—Expenditure. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

(1) Except as provided in RCW 15.13.285 and in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, all moneys collected under this chapter shall be paid to the director, deposited in an account within the agricultural local fund, and used solely for carrying out this chapter. No appropriation is required for the disbursement of moneys from the account by the director.

(2) All fees collected under RCW 15.13.310 shall be deposited in the planting stock certification account within the agricultural local fund to be used only for the Washington grapevine and fruit tree certification and nursery improvement programs as set forth in this chapter and chapter 15.14 RCW.

(3) All fees collected under RCW 15.13.311 shall be deposited in the Christmas tree account within the agricultural local fund to be used only for the Washington Christmas tree program as established under this chapter, which may include market surveys and research related to Christmas trees.

(4) All moneys collected for civil penalties under this chapter shall be deposited in the nursery research account within the agricultural local fund.

[ 2007 c 335 s 17; 2002 c 215 s 4; 2000 c 144 s 28; 1999 c 144 s 16; 1993 c 120 s 17; 1990 c 261 s 13; 1987 c 35 s 3; 1985 c 36 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 257 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 25.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 257: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions and shall take effect on July 1, 1975." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 257 s 13.]

PDFRCW 15.13.470

Disposition of moneys collected under chapter—Expenditure. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

(1) Except as provided in RCW 15.13.285 and in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, all moneys collected under this chapter shall be paid to the director, deposited in an account within the agricultural local fund, and used solely for carrying out this chapter. No appropriation is required for the disbursement of moneys from the account by the director.

(2) All fees collected under RCW 15.13.310 shall be deposited in the planting stock certification account within the agricultural local fund to be used only for the Washington grapevine and fruit tree certification and nursery improvement programs as set forth in this chapter and chapter 15.14 RCW.

(3) All moneys collected for civil penalties under this chapter shall be deposited in the nursery research account within the agricultural local fund.

[ 2002 c 215 s 4; 2000 c 144 s 28; 1999 c 144 s 16; 1993 c 120 s 17; 1990 c 261 s 13; 1987 c 35 s 3; 1985 c 36 s 5; 1975 1st ex.s. c 257 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 25.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 257: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions and shall take effect on July 1, 1975." [ 1975 1st ex.s. c 257 s 13.]